Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,132
Interagency agreement with Department of Health and Human Services; matching of funds required.

The State Department of Education shall enter into an interagency agreement with the Department of Health and Human Services to provide vocational rehabilitation services and supported employment programs to persons with developmental disabilities. The Division of Rehabilitation Services of the State Department of Education shall match all state and local funds provided by the Department of Health and Human Services and developmental disabilities regions to the extent that federal vocational rehabilitation funds are available.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 33;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1457;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 914;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 820.